Nebraska, session 109, LB575.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-1633, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1633 (1) For purposes of this section, political subdivision
means any county, city, school district, or community college.
(2) If any political subdivision seeks to increase its property tax
request by more than the allowable growth percentage, such political
subdivision may do so, subject to the limitations provided in the School
District Property Tax Limitation Act and the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, if the following requirements are met:
(a) A public hearing is held and notice of such hearing is provided
in compliance with subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) The governing body of such political subdivision passes a
resolution or an ordinance that complies with subsection (4) of this
section.
(3)(a) Each political subdivision within a county that seeks to
increase its property tax request by more than the allowable growth
percentage shall participate in a joint public hearing. Each such
political subdivision shall designate one representative to attend the
joint public hearing on behalf of the political subdivision. If a
political subdivision includes area in more than one county, the
political subdivision shall be deemed to be within the county in which
the political subdivision's principal headquarters are located. At such
hearing, there shall be no items on the agenda other than discussion on
each political subdivision's intent to increase its property tax request
by more than the allowable growth percentage.
(b) At least one elected official from each participating political
subdivision shall attend the joint public hearing. An elected official
may be the designated representative from a participating political
subdivision. The presence of a quorum or the participation of elected
officials at the joint public hearing does not constitute a meeting as
defined by section 84-1409 of the Open Meetings Act.
-2-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
(c) The joint public hearing shall be held on or after July
September 14 and prior to July September 24 and before any of the
participating political subdivisions file their adopted budget statement
pursuant to section 13-508.
(d) The joint public hearing shall be held after 6 p.m. local time
on the relevant date.
(e) The joint public hearing shall be organized by the county clerk
or his or her designee. At the joint public hearing, the designated
representative of each political subdivision shall give a brief
presentation on the political subdivision's intent to increase its
property tax request by more than the allowable growth percentage and the
effect of such request on the political subdivision's budget. The
presentation shall include:
(i) The name of the political subdivision;
(ii) The amount of the property tax request; and
(iii) The following statements:
(A) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(B) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(C) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a property
tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100 of
assessed value;
(D) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
will exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(E) To obtain more information regarding the increase in the
property tax request, citizens may contact the (name of political
subdivision) at (telephone number and email address of political
subdivision).
-3-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
(f) Any member of the public shall be allowed to speak at the joint
public hearing and shall be given a reasonable amount of time to do so.
(g) Notice of the joint public hearing shall be provided:
(i) By sending a postcard to all affected property taxpayers. The
postcard shall be sent to the name and address to which the property tax
statement is mailed;
(ii) By posting notice of the hearing on the home page of the
relevant county's website, except that this requirement shall only apply
if the county has a population of more than ten thousand inhabitants; and
(iii) By publishing notice of the hearing in a legal newspaper in or
of general circulation in the relevant county.
(h) Each political subdivision that participates in the joint public
hearing shall electronically send the information prescribed in
subdivision (3)(i) of this section to the county assessor by July
September 4. The county clerk shall notify the county assessor of the
date, time, and location of the joint public hearing no later than July
September 4. The county clerk shall notify each participating political
subdivision of the date, time, and location of the joint public hearing.
The county assessor shall send the information required to be included on
the postcards pursuant to subdivision (3)(i) of this section to a
printing service designated by the county board. The initial cost for
printing the postcards shall be paid from the county general fund. Such
postcards shall be mailed at least seven calendar days before the joint
public hearing. The cost of creating and mailing the postcards, including
staff time, materials, and postage, shall be charged proportionately to
the political subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing
based on the total number of parcels in each participating political
subdivision. Each participating political subdivision shall also maintain
a prominently displayed and easily accessible link on the home page of
the political subdivision's website to the political subdivision's
proposed budget, except that this requirement shall not apply if the
-4-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
political subdivision is a county with a population of less than ten
thousand inhabitants, a city with a population of less than one thousand
inhabitants, or, for joint public hearings prior to January 1, 2024, a
school district.
(i) The postcard sent under this subsection and the notice posted on
the county's website, if required under subdivision (3)(g)(ii) of this
section, and published in the newspaper shall include the date, time, and
location for the joint public hearing, a listing of and telephone number
for each political subdivision that will be participating in the joint
public hearing, and the amount of each participating political
subdivision's property tax request. The postcard shall also contain the
following information:
(i) The following words in capitalized type at the top of the
postcard: NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE;
(ii) The name of the county that will hold the joint public hearing,
which shall appear directly underneath the capitalized words described in
subdivision (3)(i)(i) of this section;
(iii) The following statement: The following political subdivisions
are proposing a revenue increase which would result in an overall
increase in property taxes in (insert current tax year). THE ACTUAL TAX
ON YOUR PROPERTY MAY INCREASE OR DECREASE. This notice contains estimates
of the tax on your property as a result of this revenue increase. These
estimates are calculated on the basis of the proposed (insert current tax
year) data. The actual tax on your property may vary from these
estimates.
(iv) The parcel number for the property;
(v) The name of the property owner and the address of the property;
(vi) The property's assessed value in the previous tax year;
(vii) The amount of property taxes due in the previous tax year for
each participating political subdivision;
(viii) The property's assessed value for the current tax year;
-5-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
(ix) The amount of property taxes due for the current tax year for
each participating political subdivision;
(x) The change in the amount of property taxes due for each
participating political subdivision from the previous tax year to the
current tax year; and
(xi) The following statement: To obtain more information regarding
the tax increase, citizens may contact the political subdivision at the
telephone number provided in this notice.
(4) After the joint public hearing required in subsection (3) of
this section, the governing body of each participating political
subdivision shall pass an ordinance or resolution to set such political
subdivision's property tax request. If the political subdivision is
increasing its property tax request over the amount from the prior year,
including any increase in excess of the allowable growth percentage, then
such ordinance or resolution shall include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
(a) The name of the political subdivision;
(b) The amount of the property tax request;
(c) The following statements:
(i) The total assessed value of property differs from last year's
total assessed value by ..... percent;
(ii) The tax rate which would levy the same amount of property taxes
as last year, when multiplied by the new total assessed value of
property, would be $..... per $100 of assessed value;
(iii) The (name of political subdivision) proposes to adopt a
property tax request that will cause its tax rate to be $..... per $100
of assessed value; and
(iv) Based on the proposed property tax request and changes in other
revenue, the total operating budget of (name of political subdivision)
will exceed last year's by ..... percent; and
(d) The record vote of the governing body in passing such resolution
-6-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
or ordinance.
(5) Any resolution or ordinance setting a property tax request under
this section shall be certified and forwarded to the county clerk on or
before October 15 of the year for which the tax request is to apply.
(6) The county clerk, or his or her designee, shall prepare a report
which shall include:
(a) The names of the designated representatives of the political
subdivisions participating in the joint public hearing;
(b) The name and address of each individual who spoke at the joint
public hearing, unless the address requirement is waived to protect the
security of the individual, and the name of any organization represented
by each such individual;
(c) The name of each political subdivision that participated in the
joint public hearing;
(d) The real growth value and real growth percentage for each
participating political subdivision;
(e) The amount each participating political subdivision seeks to
increase its property tax request in excess of the allowable growth
percentage; and
(f) The number of individuals who signed in to attend the joint
public hearing.
Such report shall be delivered to the political subdivisions
participating in the joint public hearing within ten days after such
hearing.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3442 (1) Except as provided in section 77-3444, property Property
tax levies for the support of local governments for fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 1998, shall be limited to the amounts set
forth in this section and shall be further limited as prescribed in
subsection (12) of this section except as provided in section 77-3444.
-7-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (2)(b) and (2)(e) of this
section, school districts and multiple-district school systems may levy a
maximum levy of one dollar and five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy.
(b) For each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, learning
communities may levy a maximum levy for the general fund budgets of
member school districts of ninety-five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The proceeds from the
levy pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed pursuant to
section 79-1073.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, for
each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, school districts that are
members of learning communities may levy for purposes of such districts'
general fund budget and special building funds a maximum combined levy of
the difference of one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars
of taxable property subject to the levy minus the learning community levy
pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section for such learning
community.
(d) Excluded from the limitations in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(c)
of this section are (i) amounts levied to pay for current and future sums
agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring prior to
September 1, 2017, (ii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for current and future qualified voluntary termination incentives for
certificated teachers pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d)
of this section, (iii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for seventy-five percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid
to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of
-8-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
employment occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31, 2018, as a
result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on
September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an exclusion
pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iv) amounts levied by a
school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a) of this section to pay for fifty percent of the current and future
sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2018,
and August 31, 2019, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in
force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in
an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (v) amounts
levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for twenty-five percent of the
current and future sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring between
September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are
not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of
this section, (vi) amounts levied in compliance with sections 79-10,110
and 79-10,110.02, and (vii) amounts levied to pay for special building
funds and sinking funds established for projects commenced prior to April
1, 1996, for construction, expansion, or alteration of school district
buildings. For purposes of this subsection, commenced means any action
taken by the school board on the record which commits the board to expend
district funds in planning, constructing, or carrying out the project.
(e) Federal aid school districts may exceed the maximum levy
prescribed by subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(c) of this section only to the
extent necessary to qualify to receive federal aid pursuant to Title VIII
of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001. For
purposes of this subdivision, federal aid school district means any
school district which receives ten percent or more of the revenue for its
-9-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
general fund budget from federal government sources pursuant to Title
VIII of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001.
(f) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one-half cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable property
subject to the levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for
remodeling of leased elementary learning center facilities, and for up to
fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital
projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant
to section 79-2111.
(g) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable
property subject to the levy for early childhood education programs for
children in poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for
contracts with other entities or individuals who are not employees of the
learning community for elementary learning center programs and services,
and for pilot projects, except that no more than ten percent of such levy
may be used for elementary learning center employees.
(3) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2023-24, community
college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(c) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. For fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter,
community college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)
(a) and (b) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. A community college area may exceed the levy provided in
subdivision (2)(a) of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to generate
sufficient revenue as described in section 85-1543 or 85-2238. A
community college area may exceed the levy provided in subdivision (2)(b)
of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to retire general obligation
bonds assumed by the community college area or issued pursuant to section
85-1515 according to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation
pursuant to section 85-1535 entered into prior to January 1, 1997.
-10-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
(4)(a) Natural resources districts may levy a maximum levy of four
and one-half cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy.
(b) Natural resources districts shall also have the power and
authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities under the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04,
not to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation
annually on all of the taxable property within the district.
(c) In addition, natural resources districts located in a river
basin, subbasin, or reach that has been determined to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated
pursuant to section 46-713 by the Department of Natural Resources shall
also have the power and authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar
amount by which their restricted funds budgeted to administer and
implement ground water management activities and integrated management
activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act
exceed their restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground
water management activities and integrated management activities for
FY2005-06, not to exceed three cents on each one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on all of the taxable property within the district for
fiscal year 2006-07 and each fiscal year thereafter through fiscal year
2017-18.
(5) Any educational service unit authorized to levy a property tax
pursuant to section 79-1225 may levy a maximum levy of one and one-half
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy.
(6)(a) Incorporated cities and villages which are not within the
-11-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
boundaries of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of forty-five
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy plus an additional five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation to provide financing for the municipality's share of revenue
required under an agreement or agreements executed pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum
levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library
pursuant to section 51-201, museum pursuant to section 51-501, visiting
community nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to
section 71-1637, or statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section
80-202.
(b) Incorporated cities and villages which are within the boundaries
of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of ninety cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The
maximum levy shall include amounts paid to a municipal county for county
services, amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to
section 51-201, a museum pursuant to section 51-501, a visiting community
nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to section
71-1637, or a statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section 80-202.
(7) Sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence
for more than five years may levy a maximum levy of forty cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, and
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less shall not have a maximum levy. Unconsolidated sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for more than five
years and are located in a municipal county may levy a maximum of eighty-
five cents per hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy.
(8) Counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of fifty cents per
one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy,
except that five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
-12-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
property subject to the levy may only be levied to provide financing for
the county's share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements
executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act. The maximum levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums
to support a library pursuant to section 51-201 or museum pursuant to
section 51-501. The county may allocate up to fifteen cents of its
authority to other political subdivisions subject to allocation of
property tax authority under subsection (1) of section 77-3443 and not
specifically covered in this section to levy taxes as authorized by law
which do not collectively exceed fifteen cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on any parcel or item of taxable property. The county
may allocate to one or more other political subdivisions subject to
allocation of property tax authority by the county under subsection (1)
of section 77-3443 some or all of the county's five cents per one hundred
dollars of valuation authorized for support of an agreement or agreements
to be levied by the political subdivision for the purpose of supporting
that political subdivision's share of revenue required under an agreement
or agreements executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the
Joint Public Agency Act. If an allocation by a county would cause another
county to exceed its levy authority under this section, the second county
may exceed the levy authority in order to levy the amount allocated.
(9) Municipal counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of one
dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy. The municipal county may allocate levy authority to any
political subdivision or entity subject to allocation under section
77-3443.
(10) Beginning July 1, 2016, rural and suburban fire protection
districts may levy a maximum levy of ten and one-half cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy if
(a) such district is located in a county that had a levy pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section in the previous year of at least forty
-13-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) such district had a levy request pursuant to section
77-3443 in any of the three previous years and the county board of the
county in which the greatest portion of the valuation of such district is
located did not authorize any levy authority to such district in such
year.
(11) A regional metropolitan transit authority may levy a maximum
levy of ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy for each fiscal year that commences on the
January 1 that follows the effective date of the conversion of the
transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law into the
regional metropolitan transit authority.
(12) In addition to the specific levy limits provided in this
section, if the total taxable valuation of property in a political
subdivision exceeds the total taxable valuation from the prior year, then
such political subdivision's levy shall be no more than the levy
necessary to raise the exact same amount of property taxes as was raised
by such political subdivision in the prior year. A political subdivision
may exceed the levy limit provided in this subsection upon the
affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the members of the governing
body of such political subdivision.
(13) (12) Property tax levies (a) for judgments, except judgments or
orders from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a
political subdivision which require or obligate a political subdivision
to pay such judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by
liability insurance coverage of a political subdivision, (b) for
preexisting lease-purchase contracts approved prior to July 1, 1998, (c)
for bonds as defined in section 10-134 approved according to law and
secured by a levy on property except as provided in section 44-4317 for
bonded indebtedness issued by educational service units and school
districts, (d) for payments by a public airport to retire interest-free
-14-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of
Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the
public airport, and (e) to pay for cancer benefits provided on or after
January 1, 2022, pursuant to the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act are not
included in the levy limits established by this section.
(14) (13) The limitations on tax levies provided in this section are
to include all other general or special levies provided by law.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the only exceptions to the
limits in this section are those provided by or authorized by sections
77-3442 to 77-3444.
(15) (14) Tax levies in excess of the limitations in this section
shall be considered unauthorized levies under section 77-1606 unless
approved under section 77-3444.
(16) (15) For purposes of sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, political
subdivision means a political subdivision of this state and a county
agricultural society.
(17) (16) For school districts that file a binding resolution on or
before May 9, 2008, with the county assessors, county clerks, and county
treasurers for all counties in which the school district has territory
pursuant to subsection (7) of section 79-458, if the combined levies,
except levies for bonded indebtedness approved by the voters of the
school district and levies for the refinancing of such bonded
indebtedness, are in excess of the greater of (a) one dollar and twenty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) the maximum levy authorized by a vote pursuant to section
77-3444, all school district levies, except levies for bonded
indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies for
the refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, shall be considered
unauthorized levies under section 77-1606.
Sec. 3. Original sections 77-1633 and 77-3442, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-15-

LB575 LB575
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-16-